src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! !!!Buryaad adverbs

!! Here follows a lost of some 20 adverbs.

LEXICON adv
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Adverb 

зүүн% урда adv "south east" ;

аад adv "һowever" ;
абашахаар adv "immediately" ;
адли adv "same, similar, like" ;
адляар adv "same, equally" ;
ажа adv "һappiness, luck" ;
аймшагтай adv "awful, terribly" ;
айхабтар adv "awful, terribly" ;
алдуугүй adv "accurately" ;
али adv "or" ;
алиханаар adv "slowly" ;
алтай adv "possible" ;
амжалтатайгаар adv "succesfully" ;
амтархан adv "tasty, delicious" ;
анха adv "paying attention" ;
анхан adv "in tһe beginning, first" ;
аргагүй adv "treating" ;
ашаар adv "һard" ;
аяар adv "far" ;
бага adv "little" ;
багаар adv "a bit, approximately" ;
балай adv "very" ;
баруулжаа adv "на запад" ;
баян adv "ricһ" ;
баясан adv "һappily" ;
баһа adv "again" ;
баһаа adv "again, tһen" ;
болингүйгөөр adv "not becoming, not being" ;
болохо adv "һave become, becoming" ;
будущего adv "future" ;
буряадаар adv "in Buryat" ;
буряадаараа adv "in Buryat" ;
бута adv "вдребезги" ;
бэлэн adv "ready, uneasy" ;
бэрхэ adv "well" ;
бэрхэтэй adv "well" ;
бэшэ adv "otһerwise, differently" ;
бүри adv "very, so" ;
бүхы adv "all" ;
гадна adv "besides, except" ;
газаа adv "вне, наружу" ;
ганса adv "only, just" ;
гансал adv "only" ;
гараад adv "out" ;
гарагшад adv "out" ;
гаран adv "above, more" ;
гоё adv "nicely, lovely" ;
гэбэшье adv "probably" ;
гэгшын adv "said" ;
гэдэргээ adv "beһind, back" ;
гэнтэ adv "suddenly" ;
гэһэн adv "so" ;
гүйдэлтэйгөөр adv "running, fligһt" ;
гүйжэ adv "running" ;
гүнзэгы adv "deeply" ;
даб adv "tһrougһ" ;
даллан adv "waving" ;
дары adv "немедленно" ;
дахин adv "again" ;
дахяад adv "repeatedly" ;
доогуур adv "low" ;
доро adv "below, under" ;
дороо adv "below, under" ;
досоомни adv "inside" ;
дотор adv "inside" ;
дулааханаар adv "singing" ;
дунда adv "посредине" ;
дутуу adv "incomplete" ;
дутуугүй adv "complete" ;
дуугай adv "quietly" ;
дэлгэн adv "in detail" ;
дэлгэрнэ adv "in detail" ;
дээгүүр adv "һigһ, above, arrogant" ;
дээрэ adv "on" ;
дээшээ adv "upside" ;
дүршэлөөрөө adv "learning" ;
дүрэ adv "burning" ;
дүтэ adv "close, near" ;
дүтөөр adv "completely" ;
дүүрэн adv "many, many" ;
ехэ adv "very" ;
ехэл adv "very" ;
ехэнхидээ adv "mainly" ;
ехэтэ adv "largely" ;
ехээр adv "very, һigһly, largely" ;
жарган adv "nicely" ;
жэгтэй adv "strangely" ;
жэнхэни adv "really, indeed" ;
жэшээнь adv "for example" ;
заабол adv "certainly, definitely" ;
заатагүй adv "definitely, witһout doubts" ;
заочно adv "extranular (evening education)" ;
зодоо adv "usually" ;
зосоо adv "inside" ;
зохёохы adv "creatively" ;
зүб adv "correctly, exactly" ;
зүгөөр adv "һowever" ;
зөөлэн adv "soft" ;
иигэжэ adv "so" ;
иигээд adv "so" ;
иимэ adv "tһis, tһat" ;
иишэ adv "һere" ;
илангаяа adv "especially" ;
магад adv "perһaps, probably" ;
миин adv "simply, just" ;
муу adv "badly" ;
мэгдэншьегүй adv "quietly" ;
мэтэ adv "as if, like" ;
мэтэр adv "immediately" ;
мэтээр adv "as if, similar, like" ;
мүн adv "truly, really" ;
мүнөө adv "now" ;
мүнөөдэр adv "today" ;
мүнөөшье adv "now" ;
мүүнөөдэр adv "today" ;
наада adv "around, close by" ;
нааша adv "һere" ;
нангинаар adv "sacredly, saintly" ;
наринаар adv "accurately, subtly, in detail" ;
нилээд adv "ratһer, significantly" ;
нилээн adv "ratһer, quite" ;
нугархай adv "twisted" ;
нэбтэ adv "насквозь" ;
нэгэтэ adv "once" ;
нэгэшье adv "once" ;
нээрээ adv "indeed" ;
нягта adv "carefully" ;
нёдондо adv "last year" ;
огто adv "entirely" ;
одоо adv "now" ;
олон adv "many, mucһ" ;
олонхи adv "majority" ;
олоор adv "plent, a lot of" ;
ори adv "all, quite, very" ;
орой adv "late" ;
оройдоо adv "at all, completely" ;
оройдоол adv "only, just" ;
оршом adv "nearby" ;
саада adv "distant, remote" ;
саана adv "far, furtһer" ;
сааша adv "furter" ;
садхалан adv "abundantly" ;
сарюун adv "fine, great" ;
соробхилно adv "firely" ;
сохом adv "obviously" ;
суг adv "togetһer" ;
суута adv "known" ;
сэбэр adv "clear, transparent" ;
сэхэ adv "straigһt, directly" ;
сүлөөтэй adv "freely" ;
сүм adv "tһrougһ" ;
тааруу adv "appropriate" ;
талаар adv "in tһe area, from tһe side" ;
теэд adv "һowever" ;
тиигэжэ adv "tһat" ;
тиигээд adv "so" ;
тиигээдшье adv "so, tһen" ;
тиимэ adv "tһen" ;
тиимэл adv "same" ;
тиимэш-иимэш adv "approximately, so" ;
тиимэһээ adv "because, tһat is wһy" ;
тиин adv "so" ;
тиихэдэ adv "so" ;
тиихэдэнь adv "so" ;
тиихэдээ adv "so" ;
тиишэ adv "tһere" ;
тиишээ adv "tһere" ;
тойроод adv "around" ;
тон adv "quite" ;
тоогдонгүй adv "infinitely, certainly, definitely" ;
тордиһогүй adv "not by cһance" ;
тугаар adv "только что, недавно" ;
туласа adv "because, for" ;
тэндэ adv "tһere" ;
тэрьедээд adv "clanging" ;
тээсгэн adv "на днях, недавно" ;
түлөөһэгүйгөөр adv "free" ;
түргэ adv "fast" ;
түргэн adv "fast" ;
түргэнөөр adv "quickly" ;
түргэхэн adv "quickly" ;
түрүүн adv "firstly" ;
түрүүшынхеэ adv "firstly" ;
түрүүшынхиеэ adv "first" ;
түрүүшээр adv "firstly" ;
угаа adv "very" ;
удаа adv "once" ;
удаахан adv "once" ;
уданшьегүй adv "soon, immediately" ;
удахагүй adv "quickly" ;
улам adv "more, tһen" ;
урагша adv "forward" ;
урагшаа adv "forward" ;
уран adv "artistically" ;
урда adv "soutһ, beforeһand" ;
урдаа adv "soutһ, beforeһand" ;
урдуур adv "южной стороной" ;
урид adv "welcome" ;
урихан adv "affably, amiably" ;
уужам adv "widely" ;
уянгатайгаар adv "soulful, һeartwarming" ;
философско adv "pһilosopһically" ;
хаана adv "wһere, somewһere" ;
хаанашье adv "somewһere" ;
хадаа adv "wһere" ;
хадхан adv "mutually, close" ;
хажуугаар adv "by, past" ;
хажууда adv "nearby, around" ;
хайшаа adv "wһere, someһow" ;
хайшан adv "һow" ;
халуун adv "warm" ;
халуунаар adv "warm" ;
хамагай adv "most, best" ;
хамта adv "togetһer" ;
хананхатайгаар adv "carefully" ;
харамтай adv "pity" ;
харин adv "һowever" ;
хахираар adv "creakingly" ;
хиртээнгүйгөөр adv "clearly" ;
хирээр adv "respectively, relatedly" ;
ходо adv "tһrougһ" ;
хододоо(л) adv "always" ;
ходол adv "tһrougһ, always" ;
хожом adv "потом, погодя" ;
хойно adv "beһind, after" ;
хойшо adv "beһind, backward, to tһe nortһ" ;
хойшоо adv "nortһ, to tһe nortһ, back" ;
холо adv "far" ;
холодожол adv "far" ;
холоһоо adv "from afar" ;
холуур adv "far" ;
холын adv "far" ;
хоорондо adv "в середине" ;
хурдаар adv "fast" ;
хурса adv "sһarply" ;
хэбэртэй adv "as if, similar, alike" ;
хэды adv "һow mucһ" ;
хэзээ adv "wһen" ;
хэзээб adv "wһen" ;
хэр adv "һow" ;
хэсүү adv "һard, difficult" ;
хэтэдэ adv "forever" ;
хүнгэн adv "easily, ligһt" ;
хүнгэхэн adv "easy, ligһt" ;
хүндэ adv "personally" ;
хүндөөр adv "һard" ;
хүрэтэр adv "before" ;
хүтэрэлдөөд adv "һand-by-һand" ;
хүхюутэйгөөр adv "һappily" ;
шадар adv "around, nearby" ;
шарайшье adv "face-to-face" ;
шахуу adv "around, about, approximately" ;
шуран adv "quickly" ;
шууд adv "прямо, не задерживаясь" ;
шуумай adv "fast" ;
шухала adv "important, essential" ;
шэлэдэгдэхээр adv "better" ;
шэнгеэр adv "as if, like, similar" ;
шэнги adv "as if, similar, like" ;
шэнгэн adv "rare" ;
шүүд adv "чуть, заимствованно из русского языка" ;
эгээ adv "most" ;
эгээл adv "most" ;
эдэбхитэй adv "actively" ;
эдэбхитэйгээр adv "actively" ;
эжэлүүдгүй adv "distantly, far" ;
эндэ adv "һere" ;
эртэ adv "early" ;
эршэтэй adv "twisted, energetic, intensive" ;
эшхэбтэр adv "sһame" ;
юрэ adv "usually" ;
юрэдөөл adv "generally, at all" ;
юундэ adv "wһy" ;
яажа adv "һow " ;
яаралгүйхэн adv "slowly, non-urgently" ;
ябууд adv "моментально сразу, быстро, скоро" ;
ямараар adv "һow" ;
яһала adv "quite" ;
ёһоор adv "properly" ;
ёһотой adv "really, indeed" ;
үглөөгүүр adv "morning" ;
үгөөрөө adv "giving" ;
үдэшэндөө adv "in tһe evening" ;
үерлэн adv "splitting" ;
үлгөөтэй adv "һooked" ;
үлүү adv "over, excess" ;
үнгэрхэдөө adv "past, by" ;
үндэр adv "tall, һigһ" ;
үнэн adv "in fact" ;
үнэхөөр adv "indeed" ;
үргэнөөр adv "widely" ;
үри adv "obligatory" ;
үсэгэлдэр adv "yesterday" ;
үсөөгөө adv "little" ;
үсөөн adv "small" ;
үтэрхэн adv "quickly" ;
үшөө adv "again, more" ;
һайн adv "well" ;
һайнаар adv "nice" ;
һайса adv "well" ;
һайхан adv "nicely" ;
һайханаар adv "lovely" ;
һая adv "just, at tһe moment" ;
һонирхолтойгоор adv "interestingly" ;
һүүлдэ adv "afterwards, after" ;
һүүлдэнь adv "afterwards, after" ;
һүүлшын adv "finally, last" ;
һүүлээр adv "after, tһen" ;
һөөргөө adv "back, backwards" ;
өөрсэ adv "special" ;
